Ohio, session 136, HB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 323.152, 323.153, and 323.156 of 5
the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 323.152. In addition to the reduction in taxes 7
required under section 319.302 of the Revised Code, taxes shall 8
be reduced as provided in divisions (A) and , (B), and (C) of 9
this section. 10
(A)(1)(a) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to any 11
of the following persons: 12
(i) A person who is permanently and totally disabled; 13
(ii) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older; 14
(iii) A person who is the surviving spouse of a deceased 15
person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five 16
years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a 17
reduction in taxes under this division in the year of death, 18

H. B. No. 266 Page 2
As Introduced
provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not 19
sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse 20
dies. 21
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 22
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a person to 23
whom division (A)(1) of this section applies shall be reduced 24
for each year for which an application for the reduction has 25
been approved. The reduction shall equal one of the following 26
amounts, as applicable to the person: 27
(i) If the person received a reduction under division (A) 28
(1) of this section for tax year 2006, the greater of the 29
reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under 30
division (A)(1)(c) of this section; 31
(ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a 32
reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 33
2013 or under division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised 34
Code for tax year 2014 or the person is the surviving spouse of 35
such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine 36
years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount 37
computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. 38
(iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(1)(b) 39
(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does 40
not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division 41
(A)(1)(d) of this section, the amount computed under division 42
(A)(1)(c) of this section. 43
(c) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(1)(c) 44
of this section equals the product of the following: 45
(i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true value of the 46
property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this 47

H. B. No. 266 Page 3
As Introduced
section; 48
(ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax 49
commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the 50
Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; 51
(iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes 52
charged against the property for the current year, where 53
"effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the 54
Revised Code; 55
(iv) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the 56
percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the 57
current tax year under section 319.302 of the Revised Code and 58
division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. 59
(d) The tax commissioner shall adjust the total income 60
threshold described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) and the reduction 61
amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(i), (A)(2), and (A)(3) 62
of this section by completing the following calculations in 63
September of each year: 64
(i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 65
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 66
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 67
first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last 68
day of December of the preceding calendar year; 69
(ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income 70
threshold or reduction amount for the current tax year, as 71
applicable; 72
(iii) Add the resulting product to the total income 73
threshold or the reduction amount, as applicable, for the 74
current tax year; 75

H. B. No. 266 Page 4
As Introduced
(iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of 76
one hundred dollars. 77
The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from 78
each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first 79
day of December each year. The certified total income threshold 80
amount applies to the following tax year for persons described 81
in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. The certified 82
reduction amount applies to the following tax year. The 83
commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any 84
calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment 85
would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction 86
amount for the current tax year. 87
(2)(a) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and 88
occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a 89
disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year for which an 90
application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction 91
shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand 92
dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted 93
under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts 94
described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. 95
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 96
of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(b), or (3) of this 97
section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and 98
occupied by a disabled veteran. 99
(b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 100
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 101
surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each 102
year an application for exemption is approved. The reduction 103
shall equal to the amount of the reduction authorized under 104
division (A)(2)(a) of this section. 105

H. B. No. 266 Page 5
As Introduced
The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 106
323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(a), or (3) 107
of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead 108
owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled 109
veteran. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under 110
division (A)(2)(b) of this section beginning in one of the 111
following tax years: 112
(i) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(1) of 113
section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled 114
veteran dies; 115
(ii) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(2) 116
of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the first year on the 117
first day of January of which the total disability rating 118
described in division (F) of that section has been received for 119
the deceased spouse. 120
In either case, the reduction shall continue through the 121
tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 122
(3) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, 123
or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the 124
surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line 125
of duty shall be reduced for each year for which an application 126
for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal 127
the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of 128
the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under 129
division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in 130
divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction 131
is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised 132
Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. The reduction 133
applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by such a 134
surviving spouse. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes 135

H. B. No. 266 Page 6
As Introduced
under division (A)(3) of this section for the tax year in which 136
the public service officer dies through the tax year in which 137
the surviving spouse dies or remarries. 138
(B) To provide a partial exemption, real property taxes on 139
any homestead, and manufactured home taxes on any manufactured 140
or mobile home on which a manufactured home tax is assessed 141
pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised 142
Code, shall be reduced for each year for which an application 143
for the reduction has been approved. The amount of the reduction 144
shall equal two and one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to 145
be levied by qualifying levies on the homestead or the 146
manufactured or mobile home after applying section 319.301 of 147
the Revised Code. For the purposes of this division, "qualifying 148
levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised 149
Code. 150
(C) Division (C) of this section applies to the first tax 151
year ending or, in the case of a manufactured or mobile home on 152
the manufactured tax list, beginning on or after the effective 153
date of this amendment, and the following four tax years, and to 154
a person who, for one or more years immediately preceding the 155
first day of the tax year or, in the case of a manufactured or 156
mobile home on the manufactured tax list, the first day of the 157
preceding tax year, has either: 158
(1) Continuously owned and occupied a homestead or 159
continuously occupied a homestead in a housing cooperative; or 160
(2) Continuously owned and occupied a manufactured or 161
mobile home while domiciled in this state. 162
Real property taxes on any homestead, including a 163
homestead in a housing cooperative, and manufactured home taxes 164

H. B. No. 266 Page 7
As Introduced
on any manufactured or mobile home, owned and occupied by a 165
person to whom division (C) of this section applies shall be 166
reduced by three hundred dollars for each year for which an 167
application for the reduction has been approved, provided that 168
the resulting tax liability shall not be less than zero. 169
(D) The reductions granted by this section do not apply to 170
special assessments or respread of assessments levied against 171
the homestead, and if there is a transfer of ownership 172
subsequent to the filing of an application for a reduction in 173
taxes, such reductions are not forfeited for such year by virtue 174
of such transfer. 175
(D)(E) The reductions in taxable value referred to in this 176
section shall be applied solely as a factor for the purpose of 177
computing the reduction of taxes under this section and shall 178
not affect the total value of property in any subdivision or 179
taxing district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax 180
lists and duplicates, or any direct or indirect limitations on 181
indebtedness of a subdivision or taxing district. If after 182
application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code, 183
including the allocation of all levies within the ten-mill 184
limitation to debt charges to the extent therein provided, there 185
would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges not 186
provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, the 187
reduction of taxes provided for in sections 323.151 to 323.159 188
of the Revised Code shall be proportionately adjusted to the 189
extent necessary to provide such funds from levies within the 190
ten-mill limitation. 191
(E)(F) No reduction shall be made on the taxes due on the 192
homestead of any person convicted of violating division (D) or 193
(E) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code for a period of three 194

H. B. No. 266 Page 8
As Introduced
years following the conviction. 195
Sec. 323.153. (A) To obtain a reduction in real property 196
taxes under division (A) or , (B), or (C) of section 323.152 of 197
the Revised Code or in manufactured home taxes under division 198
(B) or (C) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, the owner 199
shall file an application with the county auditor of the county 200
in which the owner's homestead is located. 201
To obtain a reduction in real property taxes under 202
division (A) or (C) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, the 203
occupant of a homestead in a housing cooperative shall file an 204
application with the nonprofit corporation that owns and 205
operates the housing cooperative, in accordance with this 206
paragraph. Not later than the first day of March each year, the 207
corporation shall obtain applications from the county auditor's 208
office and provide one to each new occupant. Not later than the 209
first day of May, any occupant who may be eligible for a 210
reduction in taxes under division (A) or (C) of section 323.152 211
of the Revised Code shall submit the completed application to 212
the corporation. Not later than the fifteenth day of May, the 213
corporation shall file all completed applications, and the 214
information required by division (B) of section 323.159 of the 215
Revised Code, with the county auditor of the county in which the 216
occupants' homesteads are located. Continuing applications shall 217
be furnished to an occupant in the manner provided in division 218
(C)(4) of this section. 219
(1) An application for reduction based upon a physical 220
disability shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a 221
physician, and an application for reduction based upon a mental 222
disability shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a 223
physician or psychologist licensed to practice in this state, 224

H. B. No. 266 Page 9
As Introduced
attesting to the fact that the applicant is permanently and 225
totally disabled. The certificate shall be in a form that the 226
tax commissioner requires and shall include the definition of 227
permanently and totally disabled as set forth in section 323.151 228
of the Revised Code. An application for reduction based upon a 229
disability certified as permanent and total by a state or 230
federal agency having the function of so classifying persons 231
shall be accompanied by a certificate from that agency. 232
An application by a disabled veteran or the surviving 233
spouse of a disabled veteran for the reduction under division 234
(A)(2)(a) or (b) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be 235
accompanied by a letter or other written confirmation from the 236
United States department of veterans affairs, or its predecessor 237
or successor agency, showing that the veteran qualifies as a 238
disabled veteran. 239
An application by the surviving spouse of a public service 240
officer killed in the line of duty for the reduction under 241
division (A)(3) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be 242
accompanied by a letter or other written confirmation from an 243
employee or officer of the board of trustees of a retirement or 244
pension fund in this state or another state or from the chief or 245
other chief executive of the department, agency, or other 246
employer for which the public service officer served when killed 247
in the line of duty affirming that the public service officer 248
was killed in the line of duty. 249
An application for a reduction under division (C) of 250
section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be accompanied by 251
documentation sufficient to prove that the applicant meets all 252
qualifications for that reduction. 253
An application for a reduction under division (A) or (C) 254

H. B. No. 266 Page 10
As Introduced
of section 323.152 of the Revised Code constitutes a continuing 255
application for a reduction in taxes for each year in which the 256
dwelling is the applicant's homestead or, if applicable, the 257
manufactured or mobile home is occupied by the applicant. 258
(2) An application for a reduction in taxes under division 259
(B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be filed only 260
if the homestead or manufactured or mobile home was transferred 261
in the preceding year or did not qualify for and receive the 262
reduction in taxes under that division for the preceding tax 263
year. The application for homesteads transferred in the 264
preceding year shall be incorporated into any form used by the 265
county auditor to administer the tax law in respect to the 266
conveyance of real property pursuant to section 319.20 of the 267
Revised Code or of used manufactured homes or used mobile homes 268
as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code. The owner 269
of a manufactured or mobile home who has elected under division 270
(D)(4) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code to be taxed under 271
division (D)(2) of that section for the ensuing year may file 272
the application at the time of making that election. The 273
application shall contain a statement that failure by the 274
applicant to affirm on the application that the dwelling on the 275
property conveyed is the applicant's homestead prohibits the 276
owner from receiving the reduction in taxes until a proper 277
application is filed within the period prescribed by division 278
(A)(3) of this section. Such an application constitutes a 279
continuing application for a reduction in taxes for each year in 280
which the dwelling is the applicant's homestead. 281
(3) Failure to receive a new application filed under 282
division (A)(1) or (2) or notification under division (C) of 283
this section after an application for reduction has been 284
approved is prima-facie evidence that the original applicant is 285

H. B. No. 266 Page 11
As Introduced
entitled to the reduction in taxes calculated on the basis of 286
the information contained in the original application. The 287
original application and any subsequent application, including 288
any late application, shall be in the form of a signed statement 289
and shall be filed on or before the thirty-first day of December 290
of the year for which the reduction is sought. The original 291
application and any subsequent application for a reduction in 292
manufactured home taxes shall be filed in the year preceding the 293
year for which the reduction is sought. The statement shall be 294
on a form, devised and supplied by the tax commissioner, which 295
shall require no more information than is necessary to establish 296
the applicant's eligibility for the reduction in taxes and the 297
amount of the reduction, and, except for homesteads that are 298
units in a housing cooperative, shall include an affirmation by 299
the applicant that ownership of the homestead was not acquired 300
from a person, other than the applicant's spouse, related to the 301
owner by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying 302
for the real property or manufactured home tax reduction 303
provided for in division (A) or , (B), or (C) of section 323.152 304
of the Revised Code. The form shall contain a statement that 305
conviction of willfully falsifying information to obtain a 306
reduction in taxes or failing to comply with division (C) of 307
this section results in the revocation of the right to the 308
reduction for a period of three years. In the case of an 309
application for a reduction in taxes for persons described in 310
division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, 311
the form shall contain a statement that signing the application 312
constitutes a delegation of authority by the applicant to the 313
tax commissioner or the county auditor, individually or in 314
consultation with each other, to examine any tax or financial 315
records relating to the income of the applicant as stated on the 316
application for the purpose of determining eligibility for the 317

H. B. No. 266 Page 12
As Introduced
exemption or a possible violation of division (D) or (E) of this 318
section. 319
(B) A late application for a tax reduction for the year 320
preceding the year in which an original application is filed, or 321
for a reduction in manufactured home taxes for the year in which 322
an original application is filed, may be filed with the original 323
application. If the county auditor determines the information 324
contained in the late application is correct, the auditor shall 325
determine the amount of the reduction in taxes to which the 326
applicant would have been entitled for the preceding tax year 327
had the applicant's application been timely filed and approved 328
in that year. 329
The amount of such reduction shall be treated by the 330
auditor as an overpayment of taxes by the applicant and shall be 331
refunded in the manner prescribed in section 5715.22 of the 332
Revised Code for making refunds of overpayments. The county 333
auditor shall certify the total amount of the reductions in 334
taxes made in the current year under this division to the tax 335
commissioner, who shall treat the full amount thereof as a 336
reduction in taxes for the preceding tax year and shall make 337
reimbursement to the county therefor in the manner prescribed by 338
section 323.156 of the Revised Code, from money appropriated for 339
that purpose. 340
(C)(1) If, in any year after an application has been filed 341
under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, the owner does not 342
qualify for a reduction in taxes on the homestead or on the 343
manufactured or mobile home set forth on such application, the 344
owner shall notify the county auditor that the owner is not 345
qualified for a reduction in taxes. 346
(2) If, in any year after an application has been filed 347

H. B. No. 266 Page 13
As Introduced
under division (A)(1) of this section, the occupant of a 348
homestead in a housing cooperative does not qualify for a 349
reduction in taxes on the homestead, the occupant shall notify 350
the county auditor that the occupant is not qualified for a 351
reduction in taxes or file a new application under division (A) 352
(1) of this section. 353
(3) If the county auditor or county treasurer discovers 354
that an owner of property or occupant of a homestead in a 355
housing cooperative not entitled to the reduction in taxes under 356
division (A), or (B), or (C) of section 323.152 of the Revised 357
Code failed to notify the county auditor as required by division 358
(C)(1) or (2) of this section, a charge shall be imposed against 359
the property in the amount by which taxes were reduced under 360
that division for each tax year the county auditor ascertains 361
that the property was not entitled to the reduction and was 362
owned by the current owner or, in the case of a homestead in a 363
housing cooperative, occupied by the current occupant. Interest 364
shall accrue in the manner prescribed by division (B) of section 365
323.121 or division (G)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised 366
Code on the amount by which taxes were reduced for each such tax 367
year as if the reduction became delinquent taxes at the close of 368
the last day the second installment of taxes for that tax year 369
could be paid without penalty. The county auditor shall notify 370
the owner or occupant, by ordinary mail, of the charge, of the 371
owner's or occupant's right to appeal the charge, and of the 372
manner in which the owner or occupant may appeal. The owner or 373
occupant may appeal the imposition of the charge and interest by 374
filing an appeal with the county board of revision not later 375
than the last day prescribed for payment of real and public 376
utility property taxes under section 323.12 of the Revised Code 377
following receipt of the notice and occurring at least ninety 378

H. B. No. 266 Page 14
As Introduced
days after receipt of the notice. The appeal shall be treated in 379
the same manner as a complaint relating to the valuation or 380
assessment of real property under Chapter 5715. of the Revised 381
Code. The charge and any interest shall be collected as other 382
delinquent taxes. 383
(4) Each year during January, the county auditor shall 384
furnish by ordinary mail a continuing application to each person 385
receiving a reduction under division (A) or (C) of section 386
323.152 of the Revised Code. The continuing application shall be 387
used to report changes in total income, ownership, occupancy, 388
disability, and other information earlier furnished the auditor 389
relative to the reduction in taxes on the property. The 390
continuing application shall be returned to the auditor not 391
later than the thirty-first day of December; provided, that if 392
such changes do not affect the status of the homestead exemption 393
or the amount of the reduction to which the owner is entitled 394
under division (A) or (C) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code 395
or to which the occupant is entitled under section 323.159 of 396
the Revised Code, the application does not need to be returned. 397
(5) Each year during February, the county auditor, except 398
as otherwise provided in this paragraph, shall furnish by 399
ordinary mail an original application to the owner, as of the 400
first day of January of that year, of a homestead or a 401
manufactured or mobile home that transferred during the 402
preceding calendar year and that qualified for and received a 403
reduction in taxes under division (B) of section 323.152 of the 404
Revised Code for the preceding tax year. In order to receive the 405
reduction under that division, the owner shall file the 406
application with the county auditor not later than the thirty- 407
first day of December. If the application is not timely filed, 408
the auditor shall not grant a reduction in taxes for the 409

H. B. No. 266 Page 15
As Introduced
homestead for the current year, and shall notify the owner that 410
the reduction in taxes has not been granted, in the same manner 411
prescribed under section 323.154 of the Revised Code for 412
notification of denial of an application. Failure of an owner to 413
receive an application does not excuse the failure of the owner 414
to file an original application. The county auditor is not 415
required to furnish an application under this paragraph for any 416
homestead for which application has previously been made on a 417
form incorporated into any form used by the county auditor to 418
administer the tax law in respect to the conveyance of real 419
property or of used manufactured homes or used mobile homes, and 420
an owner who previously has applied on such a form is not 421
required to return an application furnished under this 422
paragraph. 423
(D) No person shall knowingly make a false statement for 424
the purpose of obtaining a reduction in the person's real 425
property or manufactured home taxes under section 323.152 of the 426
Revised Code. 427
(E) No person shall knowingly fail to notify the county 428
auditor of changes required by division (C) of this section that 429
have the effect of maintaining or securing a reduction in taxes 430
under section 323.152 of the Revised Code. 431
(F) No person shall knowingly make a false statement or 432
certification attesting to any person's physical or mental 433
condition for purposes of qualifying such person for tax relief 434
pursuant to sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. 435
Sec. 323.156. (A) Within thirty days after a settlement of 436
taxes under divisions (A) and (C) of section 321.24 of the 437
Revised Code, the county treasurer shall certify to the tax 438
commissioner one-half of the total amount of taxes on real 439

H. B. No. 266 Page 16
As Introduced
property that were reduced pursuant to section 323.152 of the 440
Revised Code for the preceding tax year. The commissioner, 441
within thirty days of the receipt of such certifications, shall 442
provide for payment to the county treasurer, from the general 443
revenue fund, of the amount certified, which shall be credited 444
upon receipt to the county's undivided income tax fund, and an 445
amount equal to two per cent of the amount by which taxes were 446
reduced, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county 447
general fund as a payment to the county auditor and treasurer 448
for the costs of administering the exemption provided under 449
sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. 450
(B) On or before the second Monday in September of each 451
year, the county treasurer shall certify to the tax commissioner 452
the total amount by which the manufactured home taxes levied in 453
that year were reduced pursuant to division divisions (B) and 454
(C) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, as evidenced by the 455
certificates of reduction and the tax duplicate certified to the 456
county treasurer by the county auditor. The commissioner, within 457
ninety days after the receipt of such certifications, shall 458
provide for payment to the county treasurer, from the general 459
revenue fund, of the amount certified, which shall be credited 460
upon receipt to the county's undivided income tax fund, and an 461
amount equal to two per cent of the amount by which taxes were 462
reduced, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county 463
general fund as a payment to the county auditor and treasurer 464
for the costs of administering the exemption provided under 465
sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. 466
(C) Immediately upon receipt of funds into the county 467
undivided income tax fund under this section, the auditor shall 468
distribute the full amount thereof among the taxing districts in 469
the county as though the total had been paid as taxes by each 470

H. B. No. 266 Page 17
As Introduced
person for whom taxes were reduced under sections 323.151 to 471
323.159 of the Revised Code. 472
Section 2. That existing sections 323.152, 323.153, and 473
323.156 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 474
Section 3. Section 323.152 of the Revised Code is 475
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 476
by both H.B. 33 and S.B. 43 of the 135th General Assembly. The 477
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 478
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 479
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 480
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 481
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 482
presented in this act. 483